Idaho statutes. Title 38 FORESTRY, FOREST PRODUCTS AND STUMPAGE DISTRICTS
Chapter 11
SALE OF LUMBER PRODUCED OUTSIDE OF THE STATE

Sec.

§ 38-1101. Sale of lumber or lumber products produced outside of the state of Idaho.

It shall be unlawful for any individual or corporation to sell or offer for sale or dispose of, in any manner, any lumber or lumber products which have been imported into the state of Idaho from any foreign country without the same being plainly labeled in such a manner as to show the country from which said product came or in which they were produced.

§ 38-1102. Penalty.

Any person or persons violating any of the provisions of this act shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).